Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5425.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 5d. (1) An individual required to be registered under this act must not be an employee of a business that primarily provides services to individuals under the age of 18, including, but not limited to, a martial arts studio, dance studio, summer camp, tutoring service, youth sports venue, art and hobby class, mobile vending business, bowling alley, laser tag center, escape room, or any other business that allows for unsupervised access to individuals less than 18 years of age during activities. (2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), an individual who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (3) An individual who commits a second or subsequent violation of this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 4 years, a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both. (4) At the time of initial registration under this act and at each verification required under this act, the registering authority shall provide each individual required to be registered under this act with written notice of the employment restrictions imposed under this section. The notice must identify the categories of businesses and activities listed in subsection (1) and state that employment in any such business is prohibited. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.